Hawaii statutes.
§321‑472 Multidisciplinary and
multiagency reviews. The department shall conduct multidisciplinary and
multiagency reviews of domestic violence fatalities, near-deaths, and suicides
to reduce the incidence of preventable intimate partner homicides. The
director may form domestic violence fatality review teams, as necessary, by
appointing individuals to review domestic violence fatalities. A domestic
violence fatality review team shall not be subject to part I, chapter 92. [L
2006, c 82, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 203, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next